Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.155

Osteopathic or allopathic medical student clinical rotations—Foreign medical schools.

A foreign osteopathic or allopathic medical school may not prohibit a hospital or physician from entering into an agreement to provide student clinical rotations to qualified osteopathic or allopathic medical students.

[ 2011 c 150 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2011 c 150: See note following RCW 28B.115.150.